Wyoming, session 2026, HB0124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii)(A) and (xliv)(A)
is amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

HB0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0418
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xliii) A portion of a single family residential
structure. The following shall apply to the exemption under
this paragraph:

(A) Subject to subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph, the amount of the exemption under this paragraph
shall be any assessed value of the single family
residential structure that is in excess of the prior year
assessed value less any exemption authorized under this
paragraph in the prior year, plus four percent (4%) two
percent (2%);

(xliv) A portion of improved land associated
with a single family residential structure. The following
shall apply to the exemption under this paragraph:

(A) Subject to subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph, the amount of the exemption under this paragraph
shall be any assessed value of improved land associated
with a residential structure that is in excess of the prior
HB0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0418
year assessed value less any exemption authorized under
this paragraph in the prior year, plus four percent (4%)
two percent (2%);

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0124